Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 13.3 Environmental Marketing Act

6-13.3-1.
Declaration of policy.

It is the public policy of the state that environmental marketing claims, whether explicit or implied, must be substantiated by competent and reliable evidence so as not to deceive or mislead consumers about the environmental impact of products and packages.

Accurate and useful information about the environmental impact of products and packages must be made available to consumers. The uniform standards for environmental marketing claims, as contained in the Federal Trade Commission guidelines for environmental marketing claims are hereby adopted by the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 12.

6-13.3-2.
Deceptive environmental marketing claims.

It is unlawful for any person, in the course of that person’s business, vocation or occupation, to make any untruthful, deceptive, or misleading environmental marketing claims about a product or package sold or offered for sale in this state. For the purposes of this chapter, “person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, or other legal entity.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 12.

6-13.3-3.
Remedies.

If the attorney general has probable cause to believe that a person is violating or has violated §

6-13.3-2

, the attorney general may bring suit in the name of Rhode Island in the appropriate court to restrain that person from further violations of that section.

Before filing a suit under subsection (a) of this section, the attorney general shall, in writing, notify the person charged with the alleged violation of the alleged unlawful conduct and the relief to be sought. No suit shall be brought by the attorney general until thirty (30) days after that notice.

The court may award reasonable attorney fees at trial and on appeal to a prevailing party in a suit brought under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 12.

6-13.3-4.
Defenses.

It shall be a defense to any suit brought under this chapter that the person’s environmental marketing claims conform to the standards or are consistent with the examples contained in the guides for use of environmental marketing claims published by the Federal Trade Commission July 27, 1992.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 12.